District of Columbia statutes.
11-2606

Receipt of other payments.

(a)

Whenever the court finds that funds are available for payment from or on behalf of a person furnished representation, it may authorize or direct that such funds be paid to the appointed attorney, or to any person or organization authorized pursuant to section 2605 of this title [11-2605] to render investigative, expert, or other services, or to the court for deposit in the Treasury as a reimbursement to the appropriation, current at the time of payment, to carry out the provisions of this section. Except as so authorized or directed, no such person or organization may request or accept any payment or promise of payment for representing a defendant.

(b)

Any person compensated, or entitled to be compensated, for any services rendered under this chapter who shall seek, ask, demand, receive, or offer to receive, any money, goods, or services in return therefor from or on behalf of a defendant or respondent shall be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned not more than one year, or both.

History

Sept. 3, 1974, 88 Stat. 1092, Pub. L. 93-412, § 2

Section References

This section is referenced in § 11-2603.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-2606.
1973 Ed., § 11-2606.